Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.07
Veterans' Advisory Commission; members; tenure of office.

The terms of office of the members of the Veterans' Advisory Commission initially appointed shall expire on March 1 of the years 1948, 1949, 1950, 1951 and 1952, as designated by the Governor in making the respective appointments. As the terms of members expire, the Governor shall, on or before March 1 of each year, appoint or reappoint a member of the commission for a term of five years to succeed the member whose term expires. Each member shall serve until the appointment and qualification of his successor. In case of a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term of a member, the appointment shall be made only for the remainder of the term.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 8, p. 931.